aymara/morphology/Aymara Morph Analyzer release/src/aymara-rul.script
!  Aymara Alternation Rules
!  Copyright (c) 2000 Xerox Corporation.  All Rights Reserved.

!  This file is a script for the Xerox xfst interface.


!  Kenneth R. BEESLEY
!  Xerox Research Centre Europe

!  Work in Progress
!  Permission is granted to use and modify these rules provided that
!	the source is cited.

!  modified 22 Oct 2000, Kenneth R. Beesley


clear stack

echo << defining Vow >>
define Vow [a|i|u] ;

echo << defining Cons >>
define Cons [ c h | c h h | c h %' |
	        p |   p h |   p %' |
                t |   t h |   t %' |
                k |   k h |   k %' |
                q |   q h |   q %' |
                m | w |
		s | n | l | l l | r |
	        Ã± | y |
	 	j | x ] ;



	! First some cleanup (maybe change dict someday, avoid this)		

echo << defining R0 >>

define R0  %^Z -> 0 ;			! for testing only, marks comp. cero
					! currently ^C^Z on lower side

	!  Handle some phonologically conditioned allophonic variants

echo << defining R1 >>

define R1 %^YA -> [0 | y a] || _ [%^V | %^L]	

					! vII4 free variation between +waya
					! and +wa when following suffix
					! "requires a vowel"; what about ^LAYKU?
.o.
%^YA -> y a				! always underlying waya elsewhere
					! e.g. ^YA^C ; appears (22 Oct 2000)
					! to be the only other symbol after ^YA

.o.
%^L  -> %^V y a || _  %^LENGTHVSYA %^L	

			! For the exception:  normal N2V by lengthening (:)
			! changes to +ya when the following suffix consists
			! of or starts with lengthening: e.g. warmi = woman;
			! warmi: normally is "be a woman", but 1-3_Future is
			! also just :, leading to  *warmi:: (double lengthening)
			! for "I will be a woman";  in such a case you in fact get
			!  warmi ya :  =>  warmiyÃ¤   with "ya" used for N2V rather
			! than the usual lengthening; or speakers avoid it by 
			! using pta, e.g. warmiptÃ¤ (I will become a woman)

.o.
%^LENGTHVSYA -> 0	! else just delete ^LENGTHVSYA, leaving normal ^L   ;
			! lower side originally has ^L^LENGTHVSYA

.o.
%^IN -> 0 || _ %^N t i 		! indirect imperative, look at this again
				! see vFlexImperative.xml
				! this n disappears before the +ti oracional ending??
.o.
%^IN -> n			! only on -pa^N imperative ending, usually n
;

	! Handle phonological restrictions

echo << defining R2 >>

define R2       %^L %^C i %^S -> %^S || %^C p a c h a  _ 	

					! for odd inferential 3->3 -pacha
					!   ending (rather than pachi from
					! -pacha-i; I think both the final a
					! of pacha and the i of -i are strong
					! here, which may be the key)

.o.
c h i %^C -> s || _ [t|s]		! for chi-t.. -> st endings of dubitativo 
					! presente

! commented out:
! before s and t, chi seems to reduce to s (not 0), leaving ssna and ssma
! Ross had these reducing to sna and sma, but the new orthography seems
! to keep the double ss; check Yapita, reduction to s may be optional

! what is this following rule?  check it out more carefully in HVY --was
! originally inspired by Ross

!.o.
!%^C c h i -> 0 || _ %^C  i r i s t     ! for 1P dubitativo potencial 
					! (see if this causes trouble)
			                ! for we incl dubitative potencial
					 ! e.g. katu-chi-irist
					 !      katu    -irist
 					 !      katu    -urist
				         !      kar      urist (Stuart 17 Jan 2000)

					 ! sara-chi-irist
					 ! sar      irist

.o.
%^W -> 0 || %^V n a  _  %^V k i		

					! HVY p. 224, noun case ending +na (w/ weak 
					! final vowel) keeps the final vowel 
					! exceptionally just when followed
					! by +ki  (this might be an adjustment
					! to distinguish this sequence from
					! the common +na-ka N>V sequence that
					! comes out as +nka)  Normally such a
					! weak final vowel would be lost when
					! there is ANY following suffix.
! 22 Oct 2000.  HVY treats this as an exception, but morpheme-final vowel 'weakness' 
! and 'strength' may apply only before oracional suffixes like +wa,
! which would mean something like %^W -> 0 || _ ~[%^N ?*] .#.
! and perhaps also  %^S -> 0 || _ ~[%^N ?*] .#.
! i.e. they just become normal vowels except before the usual oracionals (perhaps
! excepting the ones that require a prev vowel)

! 22 Oct 2000, sent email to Start asking about such 'weak' vowels being
! followed by the other indep suffixes (puni, pini, raki, which like ki
! leave the previous vowel along)--ki may not be an exception at all.

.o.
%^W -> 0 || _ [ %^C | %^FVD | %^LAYKU ]	! a good guess; weakness would seem 	
					! redundant here; the vowel is going
					! anyway ;
				! as of 22 Oct 2000, no
				! examples of %^W %^C %^L being generated

.o.
%^W -> 0 || _ [ %^L | %^V ]		! more of a guess; assumes that
					! weakness of a morpheme-final vowel
					! is meaningful only just before the
					! common oracional suffixes; check this

.o.
[ a | i | u ] -> 0 || _ %^W %^N		! should handle the relevant cases; a guess

.o.
%^W -> 0

.o.
%^S -> 0 || _ [ %^L | %^V ]		! a good guess; strong vowels just revert
					! to neutral before suffixes that need
					! a previous vowel

.o.
%^S -> 0 || _ [ %^C | %^FVD | %^LAYKU ]	! more of a guess; assumes that strength
					! of a morpheme-final vowel is meaningful
					! only just before common oracional suffixes;
					! see Stuart's response 21-22 Oct about
					! strong +ta! (N2V resultado) followed by
					! comp cero

.o.
%^S -> 0				! maybe all that is needed for %^S

.o.
%^LAYKU -> %^C || $[Vow ?* Vow ?* Vow]  _	

					! I think that layku-like suffixes act
					! strong (delete the previous vowel) when
					! the root/stem/tema they follow has at
					! least three vowels; not completely clear
					! from the texts

.o.
%^LAYKU -> %^V				! otherwise, layku-like suffixes act weak

	! Three-vowel root rule--needs to be ordered before ^V -> 0

.o.
[a|i|u] %^V (->) 0 ||   .#. Cons* Vow (%^L) Cons+ Vow (%^L) Cons+  _

	! see HVY:113-114  for ROOTS with three vowels, the final vowel
	! can disappear even before suffixes that "need" a preceding vowel
	! (though probably not before ^L)???
	! watch the ordering on this rule
	! does this apply only to verbs?
	! see also p. 68, 71

.o.
%^V -> 0		! but usually ^V has no effect

.o.
$[%^L %^L] -> ~[?*] 	! map any strings still having double lengthening
			! to the empty language (i.e. kill them); 25 July 2000
			! all examples involved the [exclamative] suffix
.o.
[ Ã¤ | Ã¯ | Ã¼ ] %^L -> ~[?*] 	! another rare kind of double lengthening

.o.
%^C %^FVD ->  ~[?*] 		! would result in a double deletion; seems reasonable,
				! but check it again sometime

.o.
Cons [ %^L | %^FVD ] -> ~[?*] 	! can't lengthen or vowel-delete a previous consonant
;




echo << defining R3 >>

define R3        %^C c h i %^C i r i s k a -> %^C i r i s k c h i   

			! methathesis in chi + Reprochador

.o.
%^C c h i %^C i r i s k Ã¤ -> %^C i r i s k c h Ã¯   ! see HVY:158


! insert si or ji (free variation) on front of sa(Ã±a) [saÃ±a] where a strong suffix
! would leave a phonologically impossible form: e.g.
!
! 	sa-ta
!	s  ta    illegal consonant cluster at beg of word
!     sis  ta  needed  (or jista)  see HVY:141

.o.
[..] -> [ s | j ] i || .#. _ s a %^C \[a|i|u]


.o.
u %^C i -> u		! this is one that needs to be handled specially
			! "u is stronger than i in the following suffix"
			! but I think that an exception has to be made for
			! the borrowed diminutive ita/u (check this)

.o.
u %^L %^C i -> Ã¼	! see HVY:184 186 192 260  u is 'stronger' than a and i (below)
			
! .o.   poss alternate
! u %^L %^C i -> [ Ã¼ | u ]

.o.
[ a | i ] %^L %^C i -> Ã¯   ! see HVY:184 186 192 260

! .o. poss alternate
! [ a | i ] %^L %^C i -> [ Ã¯ | i ]

! do the lengthening of vowels here; with optional reshortening below;
! check this phenomenon in general
.o.
a -> Ã¤ , i -> Ã¯ , u -> Ã¼ || _ %^L       ! for suffixes that cause
                                        ! lengthening of the previous vowel

.o.
%^L -> 0


.o.
[a | i | u] -> 0 || _ [ %^C | %^FVD ] ! for suffixes that cause deletion of the
                                     !  prev vowel, incl comp. cero

.o.
Ã¤ (->) a , Ã¯ (->) i , Ã¼ (->) u || _ %^C 	! optional cancelation of lengthening
						! (verbalization) by following strong
						! suffix (see HVY:71, 238)

! what about adding ^FVD to the right context of previous rule?????

! now handled in the lexicon; probably better
! .o.
!%^J -> 0 || w j %^C _ 			! rare combination +wja-^Jita => +wjita
					! ^J occurs only on this ^Jita suffix

! review this one at some stage
.o.
%^J -> h || .#. [a|u] k %^C _ 	! ^J turns to aspiration on aka and uka

.o.
%^J -> j

.o.
[ %^FVD | %^C ]  -> 0

;

	! Need something special for oracional suffixes?

echo << defining R4 >>

define R4 %^N -> 0  		! neutral behavior of most oracional suffixes
;


echo << defining R5 >>

! reorder these?
define R5 s t Ã¼ (->) t Ã¼ s || k i _ t u	   ! for metathesis in past perf pronombres
                                                           ! neg plural
.o.
s t Ã¤ (->) t Ã¤ s || k i _ t a

;

echo << defining Accidental Capitalization >>
define AccCap  a (->) A, b (->) B, c (->) C, d (->) D, e (->) E, f (->) F, 
g (->) G, h (->) H, i (->) I, j (->) J, k (->) K, l (->) L, m (->) M, 
n (->) N, o (->) O, p (->) P, q (->) Q, r (->) R, s (->) S, t (->) T, 
u (->) U, v (->) V, w (->) W, x (->) X, y (->) Y, z (->) Z, Ã± (->) Ã || .#. _  
;


echo << composing various parts >>
read regex R0 .o. R1 .o. R2 .o. R3 .o. R4 .o. R5 .o. AccCap ;
echo << there should be only one result on the stack >>
stack


! commented out; keep around in case this form of the possessive comes
! up again
! %^L %^NeedA => a _    ! alt 1P personal possessive suffix; lengthens
                        ! prev vowel but only for /a/ vowel; somewhat
			! suspicious, probably dialectal (or phonetic 
			! but not orthographical)
! .o.
! %^NeedA -> 0
